Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-1207
Department of Health and Human Services; review rules and regulations and the awarding of funds.

Prior to the promulgation of rules and regulations pursuant to section 13-1212, and prior to the awarding of federal or state funds under any program administered by the department or any other state agency which affects the transportation of the elderly, such rules and regulations and the awarding of such funds shall be reviewed by the Department of Health and Human Services.

Laws 1975, LB 443, § 11;

Laws 1984, LB 635, § 1;

R.S.Supp.,1986, § 19-3907;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 53;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 23.